North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 3. Protection and Regulation of Fairs.

§ 106-512.
Lien against licensees’ property to secure charge.

All agricultural fairs which shall grant any privilege, license, or concession to any person, persons, firm, or corporation for vending wares or merchandise within any fairgrounds, or which shall rent any ground space for carrying on any kind of business in such fairgrounds, either upon stipulated price or for a certain percent of the receipts taken in by such person, persons, firm, or corporation, shall have the right to retain possession of and shall have a lien upon any or all the goods, wares, fixtures, and merchandise or other property of such person, persons, firm, or corporation until all charges for privileges, licenses, or concessions are paid, or until their contract is fully complied with.

History.

1915, c. 242, s. 1; C.S., s. 4950.

§ 106-513.
Notice of sale to owner.

Written notice of such sale shall be served on the owner of such goods, wares, merchandise, or fixtures or other property 10 days before such sale, if he or it be a resident of the State, but if a nonresident of the State, or his or its residence be unknown, the publication of such notice for 10 days at the courthouse door and three other public places in the county shall be sufficient service of the same.

History.

1915, c. 242, s. 2; C.S., s. 4951.

§ 106-514.
Unlawful entry on grounds a misdemeanor.

If any person, after having been expelled from the fairgrounds of any agricultural or horticultural society, shall offer to enter the same again without permission from such society; or if any person shall break over [open] the enclosing structure of said fairgrounds and enter the same, or shall enter the enclosure of said fairgrounds by means of climbing over, under or through the enclosing structure surrounding the same, or shall enter the enclosure through the gates without the permission of its gatekeeper or the proper officer of said fair association, he shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1870-1, c. 184, s. 3; Code, s. 2795; 1901, c. 291; Rev., s. 3669; C.S., s. 4952; 1993, c. 539, s. 793; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-515.
Assisting unlawful entry on grounds a misdemeanor.

It shall be unlawful for any person or persons to assist any other person or persons to enter upon the grounds of any fair association when an admission fee is charged, by assisting such other person or persons to climb over or go under the fence or by pulling off a plank or to enter the enclosed grounds by any trick or device or by passing out a ticket or a pass or in any other way. Any violation of this section shall be a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1915, c. 242, ss. 3, 4; C.S., s. 4953; 1993, c. 539, s. 794; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 106-516.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014.

History.

1915, c. 242, s. 5; C.S., s. 4954; repealed by 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014.

§ 106-516.1.
Carnivals and similar amusements not to operate without permit.

Every person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of a carnival company or a show of like kind, including menageries, merry-go-rounds, Ferris wheels, riding devices, circus and similar amusements and enterprises operated and conducted for profit, shall, prior to exhibiting in any county annually staging an agricultural fair, apply to the sheriff of the county in which the exhibit is to be held for a permit to exhibit. The sheriff of the county shall issue a permit without charge; provided, however, that no permit shall be issued if he shall find the requested exhibition date is less than 30 days prior to a regularly advertised agricultural fair. Exhibition without a permit from the sheriff of the county in which the exhibition is to be held shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor: Provided, that nothing contained in this section shall prevent veterans’ organizations and posts chartered by Congress or organized and operated on a statewide or nationwide basis from holding fairs or tobacco festivals on any dates which they may select if such fairs or festivals have heretofore been held as annual events.

History.

1953, c. 854; 1963, c. 1127; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 26; 1993, c. 539, s. 795; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2005-435, s. 43.

Local Modification.

Franklin: 1953, c. 854; Greene: 1957, c. 738.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-435, s. 43, effective September 27, 2005, deleted “and so in conflict with G.S. 105-37.1(d)” from the end of the second sentence.

§§ 106-517 through 106-520.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014, and applicable to admissions purchased on or after that date.

History.

1915, c. 242, s. 6; C.S., s. 4955; repealed by 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014. s. 106-518; 1915, c. 242, s. 7; C.S., s. 4956; 1993, c. 539, s. 796; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014. s. 106-519; 1913, c. 163, s. 1; C.S., s. 4957; repealed by 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014. s. 106-520; 1919, c. 135; C.S., s. 4958; repealed by 2013-316, s. 5(d), effective January 1, 2014.